Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-840.02
Broadcasting stations; liability.

(1) The owner, licensee, or operator of a visual or sound radio broadcasting station or network of stations, and the agents or employees of any such owner, licensee, or operator, shall not be liable for any damages for any defamatory statement published or uttered in or as a part of a visual or sound radio broadcast, by any person other than such owner, licensee, or operator, or an agent or employee thereof, unless it is alleged and proved by the complaining party that such owner, licensee, or operator, or such agent or employee, has failed to exercise due care to prevent the publication or utterance of such statement in such broadcast.

(2) In no event shall any owner, licensee, or operator, or an agent or employee thereof, be held liable for any damages for any defamatory statement uttered over the facilities of the visual or sound radio broadcasting station or network by any person other than such owner, licensee, or operator, or an agent or employee thereof, by, on behalf of, or against any candidate for public office.

(3) In any action for damages for any defamatory statement published or uttered in or as a part of a visual or sound radio broadcast, the complaining party shall be allowed only such actual damages as such party has alleged and proved.

Laws 1949, c. 316, § 1, p. 1037;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-601;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 420.

Limitation on cause of action, see section 20-209.